Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.3952

Ignition interlock devices—Officer required to report violations—Liability.

(1) Any officer conducting field inspections of ignition interlock devices under the ignition interlock program shall report violations by program participants to the court.

(2) The Washington state patrol may not be held liable for any damages resulting from any act or omission in conducting activities under the ignition interlock program, other than acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 35.]